California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) The district may acquire, construct, develop, lease, jointly develop, own, operate, maintain, control, use, jointly use, or dispose of rights-of-way, rail lines, monorails, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, parking lots, air rights, land rights, development rights, entrances and exits, and any and all other facilities for, incidental to, necessary for, or convenient for rapid transit service, including, but not limited to, facilities and structures physically or functionally related to rapid transit service, within or partly without the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon,
 or over public street, highways, bridges, or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, and may acquire, lease, sell, or otherwise contract with respect to any interest in or rights to the use or joint use of any or all of the foregoing. However, installations in state freeways are subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation and installations in other state highways are subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 670) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) The use of the streets, highways, freeways, and other public places by the district for any of the purposes permitted herein is presumed to be no greater burden on adjoining properties than the uses existing as of August 22, 1964. If facilities, other than state highways or freeways referred to above, (including, but not limited to,
 streets, highways, pipelines, sewers, water mains, storm drains, poles, communications wires, and electric transmission wires) of another public agency, of the state, or of a private owner are necessarily required to be relocated, replaced, or altered in order for the district to construct or operate its system, or if the construction or operation by the district of its system makes necessary the relocation, replacement, or alteration of any of those facilities of another public agency, of the state, or of a private owner in order to maintain the functioning of the facilities at their previous level of service, the facilities shall be relocated, replaced, or altered with reasonable promptness by the respective public corporation, state, or private owner and the district shall, by prior agreement, reimburse the public corporation, state, or private owner for the actual cost necessarily incurred in the relocation, replacement, or alteration.

(c) The district may enter into an agreement with any city or county having jurisdiction over the street or highway involved, and, as may be provided in the agreement, may close any city street or county highway at or near the point of its interception with any district facility or may make provision for carrying the city street or county highway over or under or to a connection with the district facility and may do any and all work on the city street or county highway as is necessary therefor. No city street or county highway shall be closed, either directly or indirectly, by the construction of district facilities except pursuant to such an agreement or while temporarily necessary during the construction of district facilities if the district has first obtained a temporary street or highway closing permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

30632.

The district may lease or contract for the use of its facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any city or public agency or any person, firm or private corporation engaged in the transportation of passengers for hire, properly holding a Public Utilities Commission approved and authorized certificate of public convenience and necessity for the transportation of passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30633.

The district may construct, acquire, develop, jointly develop, maintain, operate, lease, and dispose of works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any road, street, alley, avenue, or public highway or any stream, bay, watercourse, or other public ways or waterways, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, including, but not limited to, facilities and structures physically or functionally related to rapid transit service, to the same extent that those rights and privileges relating to public ways or waterways are granted to municipalities within the state for those uses or any other use or uses, including, but not
 limited to, those uses specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10101) of Chapter 1 of Division 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

30634.

(a) The district may enter into agreements for the joint use or joint development of any property or rights by the district and any city, public agency, or public utility operating transit facilities or nontransit facilities, or both, or any other person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, either, in whole or in part, within or outside the district, for the joint use or development of any property of the district or of the city, public agency, public utility, person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, or the establishment of through
 routes, joint fares, station cost-sharing, connector fees, or land, air, or development rights sales or leasing, transfer of passengers, pooling arrangements, or for any other purpose necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part. As to any service which the district is authorized to perform pursuant to this part, the district may contract for the performance of the service by any city, county, or public utility operating transit facilities, the territory of which is, in whole or in part, within the district.

(b) “Joint development” includes, but is not limited to, agreements with any person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, to develop or to engage in the planning, financing, or construction of district facilities or development projects adjacent, or physically or functionally related, to district facilities.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no joint development of nontransit facilities may be accomplished without the prior approval of the legislative body of the local jurisdiction within which the development is to take place.

(d) “Transit facilities,” as used in this section, includes land, buildings, and equipment, or any interest therein, whether or not the operation thereof produces revenue, which have as their primary purpose the operation of a rail transit system or the providing of services to the passengers of a rail transit system.

(e) “Nontransit facilities,” as used in this section, includes any land, buildings, or equipment, or interest therein, which is used primarily for the production of transit revenue not arising from the operation of a rail transit system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30635.

The district may operate such feeder bus lines and other feeder services as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30636.

As soon as practicable after the effective date of this part, the board shall cause a preliminary report to be made as to a rapid transit service and system which shall include:

(a) The estimated cost of the proposed acquisition, and construction and all incidental expenses connected therewith.

(b) The probable sources of income from the system and the estimated amount thereof.

(c) The estimated cost of maintenance and operation thereof.

(d) The proposed method or methods of financing.

(e) Any other information deemed pertinent, including, without limitation, a preliminary sketch or sketches, plan or plans or design of stations, platforms, terminals, structures and facilities constituting a method of rapid transit (all of the foregoing being hereafter referred to in this section by the word “facilities”), the proposed locations thereof and the proposed routes of the system.

The district shall, in connection with the studies necessary to determine the possible routes and locations for the said facilities, confer with the appropriate local governing bodies and other agencies that may be affected thereby and with their technical and planning personnel, obtaining where available any master or general plan in the affected areas.

The
 district shall give written notice of the preliminary report to each affected city or county that it may, within a period prescribed by the district (which period shall not be less than sixty (60) days), submit comments or evidence as to the effect that the design, location and routes of said facilities would have in their areas, including, without limitation, the effect upon property values, state and local facilities, and city street and county highway traffic.

When sufficient information has been accumulated to permit intelligent discussion, the district shall publicize and hold such public meeting or meetings as may be reasonably necessary to acquaint interested individuals, officials and civic or other groups with the studies made and the information developed and to obtain their views with respect to the preliminary report.

Using the information developed the district shall then prepare a final report containing the
 foregoing subdivisions (a) to (e) and such other matters deemed pertinent, including, without limitation, the information obtained at conferences and meetings, the relationship between all proposed routes and locations of such facilities and any master or general plans of the affected local agency or agencies and any information submitted by affected cities or counties pursuant to this section. The final report shall conclude with a recommendation as to the routes, location and design of such facilities.

The district shall serve written notice of the final report to each affected city or county that it may, within a period to be prescribed by the district (which period shall be not less than sixty (60) days), request a public hearing. Such notification shall include a statement that the district will hold a public hearing, if requested to do so by the governing body, within thirty (30) days following receipt of such written notification by the governing body;
 provided, however, that if, prior to receipt of such notification from the district, the governing body or bodies shall have, by resolution, declared that no public hearing by the district is necessary, then the notification by the district shall advise such governing body only of the intention of the district to consider the matter.

If any such governing body requests such hearing, the district shall hold a hearing, after public notice given in such manner as the district may determine, at which time and place all persons, and official bodies and other organizations interested in the matter, shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard. The district may also, on its own motion, call a public meeting or hold such hearings as it may deem appropriate. If no hearing is requested, the district may determine the routes, locations and design for the said facilities within the limits of the cities or counties to which the notice required by this section was given after the
 expiration of such period of thirty (30) days. If a hearing is requested, the district must determine the routes, location and design for said facilities within the limits of the cities or counties to which the notice required by this section was given within ninety (90) days after the first day on which such hearing is held.

This section is not intended to require in any report or reports made under the section prior to a bond election for the acquisition and construction of a line or lines or system (or such part thereof as the board determines to call a bond election on, and whether such report or reports be designated preliminary or final) detailed plans and specifications such as would be necessary for the acquisition and construction of the facilities or any part thereof, nor is it the intent of this section to prevent the district from taking advantage in the final plans and specifications of any technological advances, if the same occur, or from making
 changes due to additional information based on the results of surveys, experiments or tests.

Failure to comply in whole or part, or any defect in compliance with this section prior to a bond election, shall not affect the validity of the bond election or of the bonds, but as to any line to be acquired or constructed from the proceeds of the bonds this section must be substantially complied with prior to the expenditure of the proceeds of the bonds on such line, and no substantial change in any route theretofore determined following the procedure required by this section may be made without holding further hearings pursuant to notice given in such manner as the district may determine if the proposed change in the route is objected to by any city or county affected thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 875.)
-------------------------------------------

30636.2.

In planning the development of a rapid transit system or any part thereof within its territory and in carrying out the provisions of Section 30001, the district may extend its studies to include any city or unincorporated area not within the territory of the district. The district may invite the participation in such studies of government agencies having planning jurisdiction in such extended areas, and the studies shall be coordinated with regional comprehensive and transportation planning programs. The district may accept and use for the purpose of rapid transit planning in such extended areas any funds provided for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

30636.5.

(a) Not later than January 10, 1974, the district shall submit to the Legislature its plan for the implementation of a rapid transit system, and the financing thereof, in the district.

(b) Prior to adding any new, or extending any existing, scheduled or regularly scheduled bus service, the district shall prepare a cost-benefit study of the proposed added or extended bus service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

30637.

The district shall not exercise control over any transit facilities now or hereafter owned and operated wholly or partly within, or without, the district by any city or public agency, unless by consent of such city or public agency and upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon between the board and such city or public agency.

The district shall not establish, construct, complete, acquire, operate, extend, or reroute (all of the foregoing being hereinafter referred to by the word “establish” in all forms thereof), directly or indirectly, either itself or by lease or contract with any other person or otherwise, any rapid
 transit service or system in such manner or form as will or may, either then or at any time in the future, divert, lessen, or compete for the patronage or revenues of the existing system of a publicly or privately owned public utility without the consent of the public utility, if the existing system has been in operation since at least August 1, 1974.

The maintenance and operation, but not the extension or rerouting, of any existing system acquired by the district from a publicly or privately owned public utility shall not be deemed to be the establishment of a rapid transit service or system within the meaning of this section.

The construction by the district of any structures constituting a method of rapid transit, and the operation therein and thereon of any equipment except buses, shall not be deemed to be the establishment, construction, completion, acquisition, operation, or extension of rapid transit within the
 meaning of this section.

No publicly owned public utility shall establish, construct, complete, acquire, or extend, directly or indirectly, either itself or by lease or contract with any other person or otherwise, any rapid transit service system in such manner or form as will then substantially divert or reduce the patronage or revenues of the system operated by the district. Any municipality may acquire and operate any existing transportation system within its existing transit service area without being in violation of this paragraph and may make route extensions to such system within its existing transit service area where such extensions do not compete with the established services of the district.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as in any way preventing or restricting the City of Los Angeles or any other city from exercising any powers which it has under Section 9 of Article XI of the California Constitution,
 including, without limitation, the establishing and operation of any point to point lines or system of rapid transit to operate in connection with any other transportation services established and operated by such city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 532.)
-------------------------------------------

30638.

(a) The rates, fees, and charges for service or rights furnished, leased, or otherwise transferred pursuant to this part, including, but not limited to, station cost-sharing, connector fees, and land or air rights sales or leasing, shall be fixed by a vote of two-thirds of all of the members of the board and shall be reasonable. Insofar as practicable, the rates, fees, and charges shall be determined and fixed so as to result in revenue which will make the transit system self-supporting and shall be sufficient to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Pay the operating expenses of the district.

(2) Provide for repairs, maintenance, and depreciation of works owned or operated by the district.

(3) Provide for the purchase, lease, or acquisition of equipment under Article 3 (commencing with Section 30940) of Chapter 7.

(4) Provide for the payment of the interest and principal of the bonded debt, subject to the applicable provisions of this part authorizing the issuance and retirement of bonds.

(5) Provide for the payment of contracts, agreements, leases, equipment, trust certificates, and other legal liabilities assumed under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 31000).

(b) After making any current allocations of funds
 required for the purposes prescribed by pargraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and by the terms of any indebtedness incurred under Article 1 (commencing with Section 30900), Article 2 (commencing with Section 30930), and Article 5 (commencing with Section 30960) of Chapter 7, the board may provide funds for any purpose the board deems necessary and desirable to carry out the purposes of this part.

(c) This section does not constitute a covenant to the holders of any bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of the district unless the ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of those instruments so provides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 683, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

30638.2.

Notwithstanding Section 30638, all net income from fees, charges, rents, profits, or other net income arising from joint development of the property of the district which was acquired exclusively for the rail rapid transit system shall be used only for the following purposes:

(a) Pay the capital and operating expenses of the rail rapid transit system. 

(b) Provide for the payment of interest and principal of the bonded debt for the rail rapid transit system, subject to the applicable provisions of this part authorizing
 the issuance and retirement of bonds.

(c) Provide for the payment of contracts, agreements, leases, equipment, and other legal liabilities assumed under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 31000). 

As used in this section, “operating expenses” includes the expenses of operation, maintenance, and repair of all personal or real property physically or functionally related to rail rapid transit services or facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

30639.

The board of supervisors of a county, or the governing body of a city having territory located within the district may file a request for a hearing before the district board as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges fixed by the district and as to any proposal for fixing the location of facilities by the district. The request shall be in writing and shall state the subject matter on which a hearing is desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30640.

Upon the filing of a request for hearing as provided in Section 30639, the district board shall fix the time and place for hearing. The time fixed shall not be less than 15 days nor more than 60 days from the date the request is filed. Notice of the hearing shall be given to the county or city requesting the hearing, shall be mailed to the governing body of each city and county located, in whole or in part, within the district, and shall be published once by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

30641.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the board any board of supervisors or city governing body eligible to file a request for hearing, not a party to the original request for hearing, may intervene and shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30642.

The district, petitioner or petitioners, and the intervenors shall have the right to call and examine witnesses; to introduce exhibits; to cross-examine opposing witnesses on any matter relevant to the issues even though that matter was not covered in direct examination; and to rebut evidence introduced by other parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30643.

Oral evidence shall be taken only on oath or affirmation. The hearing need not be conducted according to technical rules relating to evidences and witnesses. Any relevant evidence shall be admitted if it is the sort of evidence on which responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious business affairs, regardless of the existence of any common law or statutory rule which might make improper the admission of such evidence over objection in a civil action. Hearsay evidence may be used for the purpose of supplementing or explaining any direct evidence but shall not be sufficient in itself to support a finding unless it would be admissible over objection
 in a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30644.

A complete record of all proceedings and testimony before the board at such hearing shall be taken down by a reporter appointed by the board. In case an action is brought to review any decision of the board, a transcript of such testimony, together with all exhibits or copies thereof introduced, together with the written request for hearing and other proceedings in the cause shall constitute the record on review; provided, however, that the board and other parties may stipulate in writing that a specified portion of the evidence be certified to the court for judgment and in such case the portion of the evidence specified and the stipulation specifying such evidence shall
 be the record on review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30645.

Within 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall render its decision, in writing, with written findings of fact. Copies of the findings and decision shall be sent immediately to the petitioners and intervenors by certified mail, postage prepaid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

30646.

The district shall be subject to regulations of the Public Utilities Commission relating to safety appliances and procedures, and the commission shall inspect all work done pursuant to this part and may make such further additions or changes necessary for the purpose of safety to employees and the general public.

The district shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission with respect to safety rules and other regulations governing the operation of street railways.

The commission shall enforce the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30647.

The district shall be subject to the provisions of Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) of the Vehicle Code with respect to the operation of buses and to the rules and regulations prescribed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to that chapter regulating the safe operation of buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Citizens’ Advisory Committees [30650. - 30656.]

30650.

Before the district takes action on a route, grades, or station location, including parking and storage facilities, for any portion of a rail transit system, the district may establish a citizens’ advisory committee in the area for any identifiable segment of a rail transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30651.

The citizens’ advisory committee may advise the district of the prevalent sentiments of its area and shall advise the board on any and all related transit issues currently under the jurisdiction of, or contemplated by, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30652.

The district may establish a citizens’ advisory committee in any identifiable area in which rail transportation is not currently contemplated, but in which the district determines that the board can benefit from public communication, advice, and reaction to district operations, policies, procedures, and plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30653.

(a) The district shall designate the area to be represented by each citizens’ advisory committee, with a separate area for any identifiable segment of a rail transit system and for any identifiable area in the district in which rail transportation is not currently contemplated.

(b) “Identifiable segment of a rail transit system” means an area of a communality of interest surrounding a station structure or structures and the lines between structures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30655.

A citizens’ advisory committee shall consist of not less than 15 persons and not more than 45 persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30656.

Every meeting of a citizens’ advisory committee is open to the general public. Minutes of the proceedings shall be kept and shall be available for inspection at the district office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Claims [30670. - 30670.]

30670.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Indebtedness [30700. - 30706.]

30700.

The district may issue any bonds, borrow money and incur indebtedness as authorized by law or in this part provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1215.)
-------------------------------------------

30701.

The district may accept contributions or loans from the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, in the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, maintenance, and operation of any transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress may have adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance,
 and cooperation may be furnished by the United States in the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, maintenance, and operation or in financing the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, maintenance, and operation of any transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary, within the limitations imposed by this part or by any indebtedness created pursuant to this part, in order to avail itself of the aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any bonds, notes, equipment trust certificates, or like evidences of indebtedness issued for a purpose authorized by this section shall be issued in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30900).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

30702.

The district may cooperate with and enter into agreements with the State of California or any public agency for the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, completion, maintenance, operation, or repair, joint or otherwise, and in whole or in part, of transit facilities. In connection with any such cooperation or contract, the state or any public agency may make public contributions to the district as in the judgment of the Legislature, or the governing board of the agency, are necessary or proper for its undertaking, and the district may reimburse the state or public agency for any advance or contribution from the proceeds of the
 sale of bonds or any other funds available to the district. The state or any public agency may also authorize, aid, and assist the district to carry out any activity which the state or public agency is authorized to perform and carry out on its own behalf. Any bonds, notes, equipment trust certificates, or like evidences of indebtedness issued for a purpose authorized by this section shall be issued in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30900).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

30703.

The district may accept contributions or loans from the State of California or any public agency, for the purpose of planning, acquiring, constructing, developing, jointly developing, operating, or maintaining a rapid transit system, including, without limitation, the payment of principal and interest and providing security funds for bonds or notes of the district issued for any of those purposes, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the state or any public agency therefor. The district is a public rapid transit district, rapid transit district, or any other type of public agency which is authorized by any
 other law to receive those contributions, loans, or cooperation, including, without limitation, Sections 11005.1 and 11104 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The district may do any and all things necessary, within the limitations imposed by this part or by any indebtedness created pursuant to this part, in order to avail itself of those contributions, loans, or cooperation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

30703.1.

The district may make an irrevocable pledge or contract in connection with the payment of the principal and the interest, sinking or reserve funds, or other obligation of any bonded indebtedness created under this part of any transit funds or other continuing or annual appropriations, contributions, grants, or loans by the United States or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, the State of California, a county, a city, or any other public agency, or any other individual or entity, public or private, pursuant to law or this article. The irrevocability of any pledge or contract hereunder shall be binding on the district to the full
 extent authorized or permitted by the laws governing or applicable to the source of those transit funds, appropriations, contributions, grants, or loans, or by this article. This article shall include, but not be limited to, appropriations or other funds authorized or allocated under Chapter 138 of the Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session, and Chapter 155 of the Statutes of 1966, First Extraordinary Session, or as they may hereafter be amended.

No transit funds, appropriations, contributions, grants, or loans received by the district shall be pledged or by contract be obligated to the payment of any district bonded indebtedness or the principal, interest, sinking or reserve fund payments of that indebtedness unless the pledge or contract is authorized or permitted by the laws governing or applicable to those transit funds, appropriations, contributions, grants, or loans including any official action that may be required of any federal, state, local, or
 public agency, or any other individual or entity, public or private, and, in the case of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds, the proposition has been approved by 60 percent of those qualified electors of the district voting on the proposition to create the indebtedness at an election called for that purpose pursuant to this part. A vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds shall authorize the use of those transit funds, appropriations, contributions, grants, or loans for those purposes and no other or further elections need be held to authorize the board to collect or provide for the collection of and to make that use of those funds or moneys. The authority to use those funds or moneys shall continue until the bonds and the interest thereon are paid or until a fund sufficient for the payment thereof or of the redemption thereof prior to maturity, with any premiums required therefor, has been created and set aside for that purpose.

“Transit funds,” as
 used in this part, means any funds or moneys payable to or received by the district from any California transit funds or any funds which the United States or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, the State of California, a county, a city, or any other public agency, or any other individual or entity, public or private, has or is authorized by any law or by official action thereunder to appropriate, contribute, grant, or loan to the district to be used for the payment of any indebtedness, including, but not limited to, any bonded indebtedness of the district in accordance with this part or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 497, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30703.2.

To the extent permitted by the law governing the source of any transit funds, appropriations, contributions, grants or loans received pursuant to this article or under any other law or otherwise, such funds or moneys may also be used to pay construction costs directly and reduce expenditures to be financed from bonds of the district, and in such event, the total amount of the bonds approved by the voters may be reduced to the extent that such transit funds, appropriations, contributions, grants or loans are so applied directly to construction costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1215.)
-------------------------------------------

30704.

The district shall not incur an indebtedness which exceeds in the aggregate 15 percent of the assessed value of all real and personal property in the district. Within the meaning of this section, “indebtedness” includes, without limitation, any and all forms thereof which the district is authorized to issue by this part or by any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

30705.

The district may also refund any indebtedness as provided in this part or in any other applicable law. The board may provide for the issuance, sale or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the district upon the terms, at the times and in the manner which it determines. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all or any part of the principal of any bonds outstanding, the interest thereon and the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity and all expenses of such refunding. The provisions of this part for issuance and sale of any bonds apply to the issuance and sale of such refunding
 bonds; except that (i) the issuance of refunding bonds shall be approved by 60 percent of the votes cast by the qualified electors of the district voting at an election called and held for that purpose except that an election is not required if the refunding is by the same type of bonds and payable from the same sources, and (ii) when refunding bonds are to be exchanged for any bonds outstanding the methods of exchange shall be as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1215.)
-------------------------------------------

30706.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions of the following terms shall apply to indebtedness under this part:

(a) “Any bond” or “any bonded indebtedness” means bonds or indebtedness of any kind or nature issued or authorized, respectively, pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30900).

(b) “Bond” means the bond authorized pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 30900) of Chapter 7.

(c) “Limited tax bond” means the bond issued
 pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 30920) of Chapter 7.

(d) “Revenue bond” means the bond issued pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 30930) of Chapter 7.

(e) “Improvement district bond” means the bond issued pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 30960) of Chapter 7.

(f) “Revenues” means any funds of the district, including transit funds other than property taxes levied under Section 30802 and special taxes levied under Section 30820.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 185.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Investments [30730. - 30730.]

30730.
